North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-18 County Hospital Associations [Repealed]

23-18-01.
Hospital associations authorized — County tax levy in aid — Election. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1949, ch. 192, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1801; S.L. 1969, ch. 259, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 15; 1983, ch. 606, § 31; 2015, ch. 439, § 26, effective January 1, 2015; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 105, effective July 1, 2017.

23-18-02.
Form of ballot. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1949, ch. 192, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1802; S.L. 1975, ch. 229, § 2; 1983, ch. 593, § 16; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 105, effective July 1, 2017.

23-18-04.
Proceeds of tax placed in special fund — Use. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1949, ch. 192, § 4; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1804; S.L. 1975, ch. 229, § 3; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 105, effective July 1, 2017.

23-18-05.
Disbursement of funds. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1949, ch. 192, § 5; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1805; S.L. 1975, ch. 229, § 4; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 105, effective July 1, 2017.

23-18-07.
Sale or disposal of hospital or clinic — Limitations. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1949, ch. 192, § 7; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1807; S.L. 1975, ch. 229, § 6; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 105, effective July 1, 2017.